inc/flattened/verb_stems_placeholders.lexc
LEXICON VERBS  !this is looking like a gateway, but not so labeled, affixes will need to be edited too
@D.Person.3@   VAI ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
@D.Person@     VII ;
               VAIO ; 
               VTI ;
	       VTA ;

! VII
LEXICON VII
^VERB^                  VII_TAG ;
^VERB_d2^:^VERB_d2^d2   VII_TAG ;
^VERB_m^:^VERB_m^m      VII_TAG ;
^VERB_n^:^VERB_n^n      VII_TAG ;

! VAI
LEXICON VAI
^VERB^              VAI_TAG ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
^VERB_m^:^VERB_m^m  VAI_TAG ; !VAIs never take third person prefix
^VERB_n^:^VERB_n^n  VAI_TAG ; !VAIs never take third person prefix

! VAIO
LEXICON VAIO
^VERB^                     VAIO_TAG ; 

! VTI
LEXICON VTI
^VERB^                     VTI_TAG ;
^VERB_m1^:^VERB_m1^m1      VTI_TAG ;
^VERB_n1^:^VERB_n1^n1      VTI_TAG ;
^VERB_n^:^VERB_n^n         VTI_TAG ;

! VTA
LEXICON VTA
^VERB^                     VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_n1^:^VERB_n1^n1      VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_s1^:^VERB_s1^s1      VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_m^:^VERB_m^m         VTA_TAG ;
^VERB_n^:^VERB_n^n         VTA_TAG ;
